Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.520

Certain communications—Privilege from examination and disclosure.

The privilege established by RCW 5.60.060(11) shall apply to all employee organizations covered by this chapter and in all proceedings authorized by this chapter.

[ 2023 c 202 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 202: See note following RCW 5.60.060.